Utah statutes.
78B-13-104.   Application to Indian tribes.

(1)  A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq., is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act.

(2)  A court of this state shall treat a tribe as a state of the United States for purposes of Part 1, General Provisions, and Part 2, Jurisdiction.

(3)  A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter shall be recognized and enforced under the provisions of Part 3, Enforcement.

